Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 339.866 is amended to read:
339.866. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Asthma” means a chronic inflammatory disorder of the airways that requires ongoing med-
ical intervention.
(b) “Medication” means any prescription for  bronchodilators or [ autoinjectable] for premeas-
ured doses of  epinephrine prescribed by a student’s Oregon  licensed health care professional for
asthma or severe allergies.
(c) “Premeasured dose” means  a fixed, precisely measured amount of medication that is
administered by an autoinjector, an intranasal device or by any other method identified by
the State Board of Education by rules adopted under ORS 339.869.
[(c)] (d) “Severe allergy” means a life-threatening hypersensitivity to a specific substance such
as food, pollen or dust.
(2) A school district board shall adopt policies  and procedures that provide for self-
administration of medication by kindergarten through grade 12  students with asthma or severe
allergies:
(a) In school;
(b) At a school-sponsored activity;
(c) While under the supervision of school personnel;
(d) In before-school or after-school care programs on school-owned property; and
(e) In transit to or from school or school-sponsored activities.
(3) The policies and procedures shall:
(a) Require that an Oregon licensed  health care professional prescribe the medication to be used
by the student during  school hours and instruct the student in the correct and responsible use of
the medication;
(b) Require that an Oregon licensed health care professional, acting within the  scope of the
person’s license, formulate a  written treatment plan for managing the student’s asthma or severe
allergy and for the use of medication by the student during school hours;
(c) Require that the parent or guardian of the student submit to the school  any written doc-
umentation required by the school, including any documents related to liability;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1504 (SB 1504-INTRO) Page 1
(d) Require that backup medication, if provided by a  student’s parent or guardian, be kept at the
student’s school in a location to which the student  has immediate access in the event the student
has an asthma or severe allergy emergency;
(e) Require the establishment of  a process by which the parent or guardian of a student may
request in writing that backup prescribed  [autoinjectable] epinephrine be kept at a reasonably secure
location in a student’s classroom if:
(A) The location identified under paragraph (d) of this subsection is not the student’s classroom;
and
(B) A  licensed health care professional verifies in writing that lack of immediate access to
[autoinjectable] epinephrine may be life threatening to the student;
(f) Require that a school request from the  student’s parent or guardian that the parent or
guardian provide medication for emergency use by the student; and
(g) Allow a school to revoke its permission for a student to self-administer medication if  the
student does not responsibly self-administer the medication or abuses the use of the medication.
(4) A school district board may impose other policies and procedures that  the board determines
are necessary to protect a student with asthma or a severe allergy.
(5) A school district board may  not require school personnel who have not received appropriate
training to assist a student with asthma or a severe allergy with self-administration of medication.
(6) This section does not apply to youth correction facilities.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 339.867 is amended to read:
339.867. As used in ORS 339.869 , [ and] 339.870 and 339.871:
(1)(a) “Medication” means:
(A) Medication that is not injected;
(B) Premeasured doses of epinephrine [ that are injected ];
(C) Medication that is available for treating adrenal insufficiency; and
(D) Naloxone or any similar medication that is in any form available  for safe administration and
that is designed to rapidly reverse an overdose of an opioid drug.
(b) “Medication” does not include nonprescription sunscreen.
(2) “Opioid overdose” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.800.
(3) “Premeasured dose” means a  fixed, precisely measured amount of medication that is
administered by an autoinjector, an intranasal device or by any other method identified by
the State Board of Education by rules adopted under ORS 339.869.
[(3)] (4) “Short-acting opioid antagonist” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.800.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 339.871 is amended to read:
339.871. (1) A school administrator, school  nurse, teacher or other school employee designated
by the school administrator is not liable in a criminal action or for civil damages as  a result of a
student’s self-administration of medication, as described in ORS 339.866, if  the school administrator,
school nurse, teacher or other school  employee, in compliance with the instructions of the student’s
Oregon licensed health  care professional, in good faith assists the student’s self-administration of the
medication, if the medication is available to the student  pursuant to written permission and in-
structions of the student’s parent, guardian or Oregon licensed health care professional.
(2) A school administrator,  school nurse, teacher or other school employee designated by the
school administrator is not liable in a criminal action or for civil damages as a result of the use  of
medication if the school administrator,  school nurse, teacher or other school employee in good faith
administers [ autoinjectable] a premeasured dose of  epinephrine to a student or  other individual
with a severe allergy who is  unable to self-administer the medication, regardless of whether the
student or individual has a prescription for epinephrine.
(3) A school district  and the members of a school district board are not liable in a criminal
action or for civil damages as a result of the use of medication if:
(a) Any person in good faith administers [ autoinjectable] a premeasured dose of  epinephrine to
a student or other individual with a severe allergy who is unable to self-administer  the medication,
regardless of whether the student or individual has a prescription for epinephrine; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1504 (SB 1504-INTRO) Page 2
(b) The person administered the [ autoinjectable] premeasured dose of  epinephrine  on school
premises, including at a school, on school property under the jurisdiction  of the district or at an
activity under the jurisdiction of the school district.
(4) The civil and criminal immunities imposed by this section do not apply to an act or omission
amounting to gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct.
SECTION 4.  ORS 433.800 is amended to read:
433.800. As used in ORS 433.800 to 433.830, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Adrenal crisis” means a sudden,  severe worsening of symptoms associated with adrenal in-
sufficiency, such as severe pain in the lower back, abdomen or  legs, vomiting, diarrhea, dehydration,
low blood pressure or loss of consciousness.
(2) “Adrenal insufficiency” means a  hormonal disorder that occurs when the adrenal glands do
not produce enough adrenal hormones.
(3) “Allergen” means a substance, usually a protein, that evokes a particular  adverse response
in a sensitive individual.
(4) “Allergic response” means a medical condition caused  by exposure to an allergen, with
physical symptoms that range from localized itching to severe anaphylactic  shock and that may be
life threatening.
(5) “Hypoglycemia” means a condition  in which a person experiences low blood sugar, producing
symptoms such as drowsiness, loss of muscle control so that chewing or  swallowing is impaired, ir-
rational behavior in which food intake is resisted, convulsions, fainting or coma.
(6) “Nurse practitioner” means a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS chapter 678.
(7) “Other treatment” means oral administration of food  containing glucose or other forms of
carbohydrate, such as jelly or candy.
(8) “Other treatment has failed” means a  hypoglycemic student’s symptoms have worsened after
the administration of a food containing  glucose or other form of carbohydrate or a hypoglycemic
student has become incoherent, unconscious or unresponsive.
(9) “Physician” means a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677.
(10) “Physician associate” means a physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525.
(11) “Premeasured dose” means a fixed,  precisely measured amount of medication that
is administered by an autoinjector,  an intranasal device or by any other method identified
by the Oregon Health Authority by rules adopted under ORS 433.810.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 433.815 is amended to read:
433.815. (1)  Educational training on the treatment of allergic responses, as required by ORS
433.800 to 433.830, shall be  conducted by a physician, physician associate or nurse practitioner. The
training may be conducted by any other health care professional licensed under ORS chapter  678
as assigned by a physician, physician  associate or nurse practitioner, or by an emergency medical
services provider meeting the requirements established  by the Oregon Health Authority by rule. The
curricula shall include, at a minimum, the following subjects:
(a) Recognition of the symptoms of systemic allergic responses  to insect stings and other
allergens;
(b) Familiarity with common factors that are likely to elicit systemic allergic responses;
(c) Proper administration of [ an intramuscular or subcutaneous injection of epinephrine ] a pre-
measured dose of epinephrine  for severe allergic responses to insect stings and  other specific
allergens; and
(d) Necessary follow-up treatment.
(2) Educational training on the treatment of hypoglycemia,  as required by ORS 433.800 to
433.830, shall be conducted  by a physician, physician associate, nurse practitioner or any other
health care professional licensed under ORS chapter 678. The curricula shall include, at  a minimum,
the following subjects:
(a) Recognition of the symptoms of hypoglycemia;
(b) Familiarity with common factors that may induce hypoglycemia;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1504 (SB 1504-INTRO) Page 3
(c) Proper administration of a subcutaneous injection of glucagon for severe hypoglycemia when
other treatment has failed or cannot be initiated; and
(d) Necessary follow-up treatment.
(3) Educational training on the treatment of  adrenal insufficiency, as required by ORS 433.800
to 433.830, shall be conducted by a physician, physician  associate, nurse practitioner or any other
health care professional licensed under ORS chapter 678. The curricula shall include, at  a minimum,
the following subjects:
(a) General information about adrenal insufficiency and the dangers associated with adrenal in-
sufficiency;
(b) Recognition of the symptoms of a person who is experiencing an adrenal crisis;
(c) The types of medications that are available for treating adrenal insufficiency; and
(d) Proper administration of medications that treat adrenal insufficiency.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 433.817 is amended to read:
433.817. Educational training on the treatment of allergic responses, as required by  ORS 433.800
to 433.830, may be  conducted by a public health authority or organization or by any other entity
or individual approved by the Oregon  Health Authority by rule. The training curricula under this
section must include the following subjects:
(1) Recognition of the symptoms of systemic  allergic responses to insect stings and other
allergens;
(2) Familiarity with common factors that are likely to elicit systemic allergic responses;
(3) Proper administration of [ an intramuscular or subcutaneous injection  of epinephrine ] a pre-
measured dose of  epinephrine for severe allergic responses to insect stings and other specific
allergens; and
(4) Necessary follow-up treatment.
Passed by Senate February 12, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 26, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1504 (SB 1504-INTRO) Page 4